Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2330.03
Termination of system or contributions; effect.

Upon termination or partial termination of the retirement system or upon complete discontinuance of contributions under the retirement system, the rights of all affected members to the amounts credited to the members' accounts shall be nonforfeitable.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 31.